Washington statutes.
RCW 15.92.050

Food and environmental quality laboratory.

A food and environmental quality laboratory operated by Washington State University is established in the Tri-Cities area to conduct pesticide residue studies concerning fresh and processed foods, in the environment, and for human and animal safety. The laboratory shall cooperate with public and private laboratories in Washington, Idaho, and Oregon.

[ 1991 c 341 s 6.]